New York, session 2025-2026, S9449.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 3 and 3-a of section 205 of the vehicle and 2 traffic law, as amended by section 1 of part M of chapter 58 of the laws 3 of 2023, are amended to read as follows: 4 3. Each such county clerk shall retain from fees collected for any 5 motor vehicle related service described in subdivision one of this 6 section processed by such county clerk an amount based on a percentage 7 of gross receipts collected. For purposes of this section, the term 8 "gross receipts" shall include all fines, fees and penalties collected 9 pursuant to this chapter by a county clerk acting as agent of the 10 commissioner, but shall not include any state or local sales or compen- 11 sating use taxes imposed under or pursuant to the authority of articles 12 twenty-eight and twenty-nine of the tax law and collected by such clerk 13 on behalf of the commissioner of taxation and finance. The retention 14 percentage shall be [10.75] twenty-five percent. 15 3-a. In addition to the fees retained pursuant to subdivision three of 16 this section, each county clerk acting as the agent of the commissioner 17 pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall retain a percentage of 18 "enhanced internet and electronic partner revenue" collected by the 19 commissioner. For the purposes of this subdivision, "enhanced internet 20 and electronic partner revenue" shall mean the amount of gross receipts 21 attributable to all transactions conducted on the internet by residents 22 of such county and by designated partners of the department on behalf of 23 such residents for the current calendar year. The commissioner shall 24 certify the amounts to be retained by each county clerk pursuant to this 25 subdivision. The retention percentage shall be [10.75] twenty-five 26 percent. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 28 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14747-01-6